Utah statutes.
41-1a-230.   Registration checkoff for vision screening.
(1)  A person who applies for a motor vehicle registration or registration
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution for vision screening of $2.
(2)  This contribution shall be:
(a)  collected by the division;
(b)  treated as a voluntary contribution to Friends For Sight to provide
blindness prevention education, screening, and treatment and not as a motor
vehicle registration fee; and
(c)  transferred to Friends For Sight at least monthly, less actual
administrative costs associated with collecting and transferring the
contributions.
